Florida, session 2026, HB85.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (1) and paragraph (b) of subsection
(2) of section 514.073, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
514.073 Swimming Lesson Voucher Program.—
(1) There is created within the department the Swimming
Lesson Voucher Program. The purpose of the program is to
increase water safety in this state by offering vouchers for
swimming lessons at no cost to families with an income of no
more than 200 percent of the federal poverty level who have one
or more children between 1 and 7 4 years of age or younger.
(2) The department shall do all of the following to
implement the program:
(b) Establish a method for members of the public to apply
for swimming lesson vouchers and for determining an applicant's
eligibility. The department shall establish eligibility criteria
necessary for a family to receive one or more vouchers from the
program, including, but not limited to, the following:
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb85-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 85 2026
1. The age of each child for whom a voucher is being
sought, who must be between 1 and 7 may be no more than 4 years
of age.
2. The family income level, which may be up to 200 percent
of the federal poverty level.
3. The family's address of residency in this state.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb85-00